Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1711
Assessment tool; state agencies; utilize.

State agencies, including the Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Labor, which assess training options, job readiness, adult basic skills, aptitudes, interests, workplace maturity, and career development of applicants for services shall utilize a common, comprehensive assessment tool.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 455, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 356.